Louisiana, session 2026, HB147.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:1352(A)(89) and (90) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1352. Definitions
A. As used in this Chapter, "racketeering activity" means committing,
attempting to commit, conspiring to commit, or soliciting, coercing, or intimidating
another person to commit any crime that is punishable under the following
provisions of Title 14 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, the Uniform
Controlled Dangerous Substances Law, or the Louisiana Securities Law:
* * *
(89) R.S. 14:67.6 (Mail theft)
(90) R.S. 14:67.7 (Theft or unauthorized reproduction of a mail receptacle
key or lock)
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 147 ENROLLED
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
renumber the Paragraphs of R.S. 15:1352(A) so as to properly place R.S. 15:1352(A)(89)
and (90) as enacted by this Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.